Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-580 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Barbara Weber
Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis (ALS) Grant Program".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-580.1 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created the Barbara Weber Amyotrophic Lateral
Sclerosis (ALS) Grant Program which shall be administered by the
State Department of Health. The program shall grant funds to

support research for Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis (ALS) and for
programs that help support Oklahoma residents afflicted with ALS or
Oklahoma residents caring for a family member afflicted with ALS.
Beginning July 1, 2026, the State Department of Health shall provide
an annual report to the Governor, the Speaker of the Oklahoma House
of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State
Senate, Appropriations and Budget Chair of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives, and the Appropriations Chair of the Oklahoma State
Senate that includes, but is not limited to, how many grants have
been awarded during the previous fiscal year, which entities the
grants have been awarded to, and for what purposes the funds are
supporting.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-580.2 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the Oklahoma State Treasury a
revolving fund for the State Department of Health to be designated
the "Barbara Weber Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis (ALS) Grant Program
Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received
by the State Department of Health from appropriations, donations,
grants, or other sources of funding specifically designated for
deposit to the Barbara Weber Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis (ALS)
Grant Program Revolving Fund. All monies accruing to the credit of
said fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended
by the State Department of Health for the purpose of the Barbara
Weber Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis (ALS) Grant Program.
Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by
the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1278 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 4th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1278 Page 3